District of Columbia statutes.
5-545.03

Subchapter not construed to decrease compensation; exception as to vacancy.

Nothing contained in §§ 5-541.01 to 5-545.06 shall be construed to decrease the existing rate of compensation of any present officer or member, but when his position becomes vacant any subsequent appointee to such position shall be compensated in accordance with the rate of pay applicable to such position.

Aug. 1, 1958, 72 Stat. 485, Pub. L. 85-584, title V, § 503
1973 Ed., § 4-834.
1981 Ed., § 4-417.
This section is referenced in § 5-545.06a.